utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.aff
SFX Q Y 45
SFX Q is   a   [^cdstzln]is
SFX Q cis  ča   [c]is
SFX Q dis  ža   [d]is
SFX Q sis  ša   [s]is
SFX Q tis  ša   [t]is
SFX Q zis  ža   [z]is
SFX Q lis  ļa  [^sz][l]is
SFX Q nis  ņa  [^sz][n]is
SFX Q slis šļa  [s][l]is
SFX Q snis šņa  [s][n]is
SFX Q zlis žļa  [z][l]is
SFX Q znis žņa  [z][n]is
SFX Q is   am  [^cdstzln]is
SFX Q cis  čam  [c]is
SFX Q dis  žam  [d]is
SFX Q sis  šam  [s]is
SFX Q tis  šam  [t]is
SFX Q tis  žam  [z]is
SFX Q lis  ļam [^sz][l]is
SFX Q nis  ņam [^sz][n]is
SFX Q slis šļam [s][l]is
SFX Q snis šņam [s][n]is
SFX Q zlis žļam [z][l]is
SFX Q znis žņam [z][n]is
SFX Q s   0    is
SFX Q is  ī    is
SFX Q s   a   [^icdstzln]s
SFX Q cs  ča   [c]s
SFX Q ds  ža   [d]s
SFX Q ss  ša   [s]s
SFX Q ts  ša   [t]s
SFX Q zs  ža   [z]s
SFX Q ls  ļa   [l]s
SFX Q ns  ņa   [n]s
SFX Q s   am  [^icdstzln]s
SFX Q cs  čam  [c]s
SFX Q ds  žam  [d]s
SFX Q ss  šam  [s]s
SFX Q ts  šam  [t]s
SFX Q zs  žam  [z]s
SFX Q ls  ļam  [l]s
SFX Q ns  ņam  [n]s
SFX Q s   i   [^i]s
SFX Q s   ī   [^i]s
SFX Q s   0   [^i]s

SFX q Y 98
SFX q cis   či     [c]is
SFX q dis   ži     [d]is
SFX q sis   ši     [s]is
SFX q tis   ši     [t]is
SFX q zis   ži     [z]is
SFX q lis   ļi     [^sz][l]is
SFX q nis   ņi     [^sz][n]is
SFX q slis  šļi    [s][l]is
SFX q snis  šņi    [s][n]is
SFX q zlis  žļi    [z][l]is
SFX q znis  žņi    [z][n]is
SFX q is    u     [^cdstzln]is
SFX q cis   ču     [c]is
SFX q dis   žu     [d]is
SFX q sis   šu     [s]is
SFX q tis   šu     [t]is
SFX q zis   žu     [z]is
SFX q lis   ļu     [^sz][l]is
SFX q nis   ņu     [^sz][n]is
SFX q slis  šļu    [s][l]is
SFX q snis  šņu    [s][n]is
SFX q zlis  žļu    [z][l]is
SFX q znis  žņu    [z][n]is
SFX q s     m     [^cdstzln]is
SFX q cis   čim    [c]is
SFX q dis   žim    [d]is
SFX q sis   šim    [s]is
SFX q tis   šim    [t]is
SFX q tis   žim    [z]is
SFX q lis   ļim    [^sz][l]is
SFX q nis   ņim    [^sz][n]is
SFX q slis  šļim   [s][l]is
SFX q snis  šņim   [s][n]is
SFX q zlis  žļim   [z][l]is
SFX q znis  žņim   [z][n]is
SFX q is    us    [^cdstzln]is
SFX q cis   čus    [c]is
SFX q dis   žus    [d]is
SFX q sis   šus    [s]is
SFX q tis   šus    [t]is
SFX q tis   žus    [z]is
SFX q lis   ļus    [^sz][l]is
SFX q nis   ņus    [^sz][n]is
SFX q slis  šļus   [s][l]is
SFX q snis  šņus   [s][n]is
SFX q zlis  žļus   [z][l]is
SFX q znis  žņus   [z][n]is
SFX q is    ūs    [^cdstzln]is
SFX q cis   čūs    [c]is
SFX q dis   žūs    [d]is
SFX q sis   šūs    [s]is
SFX q tis   šūs    [t]is
SFX q tis   žūs    [z]is
SFX q lis   ļūs    [^sz][l]is
SFX q nis   ņūs    [^sz][n]is
SFX q slis  šļūs   [s][l]is
SFX q snis  šņūs   [s][n]is
SFX q zlis  žļūs   [z][l]is
SFX q znis  žņūs   [z][n]is
SFX q cs   či   [c]s
SFX q ds   ži   [d]s
SFX q ss   ši   [s]s
SFX q ts   ši   [t]s
SFX q zs   ži   [z]s
SFX q ls   ļi   [l]s
SFX q ns   ņi   [n]s
SFX q s    u   [^icdstzln]s
SFX q cs   ču   [c]s
SFX q ds   žu   [d]s
SFX q ss   šu   [s]s
SFX q ts   šu   [t]s
SFX q zs   žu   [z]s
SFX q ls   ļu   [l]s
SFX q ns   ņu   [n]s
SFX q s    im  [^icdstzln]s
SFX q cs   čim  [c]s
SFX q ds   žim  [d]s
SFX q ss   šim  [s]s
SFX q ts   šim  [t]s
SFX q zs   žim  [z]s
SFX q ls   ļim  [l]s
SFX q ns   ņim  [n]s
SFX q s    us  [^icdstzln]s
SFX q cs   čus  [c]s
SFX q ds   žus  [d]s
SFX q ss   šus  [s]s
SFX q ts   šus  [t]s
SFX q zs   žus  [z]s
SFX q ls   ļus  [l]s
SFX q ns   ņus  [n]s
SFX q s    ūs  [^icdstzln]s
SFX q cs   čūs  [c]s
SFX q ds   žūs  [d]s
SFX q ss   šūs  [s]s
SFX q ts   šūs  [t]s
SFX q zs   žūs  [z]s
SFX q ls   ļūs  [l]s
SFX q ns   ņūs  [n]s

SFX R Y 12
SFX R is eits   is
SFX R is eiša   is
SFX R is eišam  is
SFX R is eiti   is
SFX R is eitī   is
SFX R is eit    is
SFX R s  eits  [^i]s
SFX R s  eiša  [^i]s
SFX R s  eišam [^i]s
SFX R s  eiti  [^i]s
SFX R s  eitī  [^i]s
SFX R s  eit   [^i]s

SFX r Y 10
SFX r is eiši   is
SFX r is eišu   is
SFX r is eišim  is
SFX r is eišus  is
SFX r is eišūs  is
SFX r s  eiši  [^i]s
SFX r s  eišu  [^i]s
SFX r s  eišim [^i]s
SFX r s  eišus [^i]s
SFX r s  eišūs [^i]s

SFX S Y 16
SFX S a   ys [^ļj]a
SFX S ļa  lis [ļ]a
SFX S a   is  [j]a
SFX S 0   i   a
SFX S a   u   a
SFX S a   ā   a
SFX S e  is  e
SFX S 0  i   e
SFX S e  i   e
SFX S e  ē   e
SFX S s   m   [u]s
SFX S s   0   [u]s
SFX S us  ū   [u]s
SFX S s ei  [^u]s
SFX S s i   [^u]s
SFX S s ī   [^u]s

SFX s Y 27
SFX s a    om   a
SFX s a    uos  a
SFX s e    u   [^cdlnstz]e
SFX s ce   ču  [c]e
SFX s de   žu  [d]e
SFX s le   ļu  [l]e
SFX s ne   ņu  [^sz]ne
SFX s sne  šņu [s]ne
SFX s zne  žņu [z]ne
SFX s se   šu  [s]e
SFX s te   šu  [^s]te
SFX s te   tu  [^k]ste
SFX s ste  šu  [k]ste
SFX s ze   žu  [z]e
SFX s 0    m   [e]
SFX s e    ēs  [e]
SFX s s   u    [^udstz]s
SFX s s   im   [^u]s
SFX s s   īs   [^u]s
SFX s us  i     us
SFX s us  im    us
SFX s us  ūs    us
SFX s ds  žu    ds
SFX s ss  šu    ss
SFX s zs  žu    zs
SFX s ts  šu [^k][^s]ts
SFX s sts šu    ksts
