utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
abreviatura/Ss
absoluceja/Ss
adeklis/Qq
administraceja/Ss
adopceja/S
aeraceja/S
agentura/Ss
agoneja/S
agregaceja/Ss
ainova/Ss
aizdedze/S
aizguodnis/Qq
aizsardzeiba/Ss
aizsorgbyuve/Ss
akaceja/Ss
akarologeja/Ss
akreditaceja/Ss
aktineja/Ss
akumulaceja/S
akvakultura/Ss
aleja/Ss
alternativa/Ss
amplituda/Ss
anekseja/S
Angelika/Ss
animaceja/S
anomaleja/Ss
ansamblis/QqRr
antimatereja/S
antipateja/Ss
apakškategoreja/Ss
apakškultura/Ss
apakšsistema/Ss
apcere/Ss
apdzeivuoteiba/Ss
apgrūzeiba/Ss
apjiemeiba/S
aplikaceja/Ss
apretura/Ss
aprobaceja/Ss
apstuoklis/Qq
apvīneiba/Ss
apvuiceiba/Ss
aritmeja/Ss
armeja/Ss
arteriografeja/Ss
asameiba/Ss
Asinova/S
aste/SsTt
ateja/Ss
atestaceja/Ss
atlaidys/s
atmosfera/Ss
atomspākstaceja/Ss
atraitne/SsTt
atrakceja/Ss
atslāga/SsTt
attīksme/Ss
atvodys/s
audiosistema/Ss
auditorkompaneja/Ss
audzieknis/Qq
Augustina/SsTt
auss/Ss
Austrumvaceja/S
autoekspediceja/Ss
automatizaceja/S
autortīseibys/s
avareja/Ss
aveneja/Ss
āka/Ss
Āzeja/S
bagateiba/Ss
bakteriologeja/S
bandura/Ss
bareiba/Ss
baryne/SsTt
barūklis/QqRr
bauda/Ss
Bavareja/S
begoneja/Ss
bezdīveiba/S
bezizeja/Ss
biografeja/Ss
bite/SsTt
bižutereja/S
byuvkonstrukceja/Ss
bļaka/Ss
bolūds/QqRr
bolva/Ss
Bosneja/S
brošura/SsTt
buoba/SsTt
burtnīceiba/S
butaforeja/Ss
ceiruļs/QqRr
ceļs/QqRr
ceļtnīceiba/S
centralbīdreiba/Ss
ceremoneja/Ss
cikcaklineja/Ss
cirkulaceja/S
Dagnis/QqRr
daktiloskopeja/S
daleiborganizaceja/Ss
datorprogrammatura/Ss
datorsistema/Ss
daudzskaitlis/Q
debija/Ss
degeneraceja/Ss
deklamaceja/Ss
dekompensaceja/Ss
dekoncentraceja/Ss
demarkaceja/Ss
demiseja/Ss
demonstraceja/Ss
denacionalizaceja/S
depilaceja/Ss
deportaceja/Ss
deratizaceja/Ss
destrukceja/S
detekceja/Ss
dezinfekceja/Ss
dezinsekceja/Ss
dezorientaceja/Ss
diatermeja/S
dilogeja/S
dimenseja/Ss
disciplineiteiba/S
disertaceja/Ss
diskriminaceja/Ss
dispoziceja/S
diversifikaceja/Ss
divskaņs/Qq
dybynuotuojorganizaceja/Ss
dīna/Ss
doba/S
Dominika/Ss
dotaceja/Ss
draudzeiba/Ss
drūšeiba/S-
duglazeja/Ss
dzeiveiba/Ss
dzeive/Ss
dzeivūklis/QqRr
dzelzs/QqRr
dzens/QqRr
dzērve/SsTt
dzimtine/Ss
eiridika/S
eiroobligaceja/Ss
eitrofikaceja/S
eksekuceja/Ss
ekskavaceja/Ss
eksplozeja/Ss
ekspoziceja/Ss
ekstinkceja/S
ekzema/Ss
elektroarmatura/S
elektrosekceja/Ss
elksnis/QqRr
Emileja/Ss
emulseja/Ss
energoinspekceja/S
energosistema/Ss
eparheja/Ss
epidemeja/Ss
erozeja/S
etologeja/S
etveja/Ss
filma/Ss
folklora/S
gadīns/Qq
gaiļs/QqRr
gaisma/SsTt
galaktika/Ss
galereja/Ss
ganeiba/Ss
gaška/Ss
gazifikaceja/S
generallineja/Ss
geodezeja/S
gigakaloreja/Ss
gloksineja/Ss
gludeklis/QqRr
gluoze/Ss
golūtne/SsTt
grafika/Ss
gramatika/Ss
gramūklis/QqRr
greislis/QqRr
greizsirdeiba/S
gryuslis/QqRr
gruobeklis/QqRr
gruomota/Ss
gruomotnīceiba/S
guns/Ss
habilitaceja/S
halucinaceja/Ss
hematologeja/S
hidroelektrostaceja/Ss
hidroenergeja/S
hierarheja/Ss
hipertenseja/Ss
histereja/Ss
hortenzeja/Ss
hrestomateja/Ss
Ibereja/S
ideologeja/Ss
ierklis/QqRr
ihtiologeja/S
Ilga/Ss
imatrikulaceja/S
imitaceja/Ss
improvizaceja/Ss
indikaceja/Ss
infekceja/Ss
infektologeja/S
infuzoreja/Ss
inhalaceja/Ss
inkarnaceja/Ss
inkviziceja/S
inspekceja/Ss
instrukceja/Ss
instrumentaceja/Ss
intermedeja/Ss
internacionalizaceja/Ss
interpretaceja/Ss
intervenceja/S
intonema/Ss
inventura/Ss
investiceja/Ss
Italeja/S
iudiņslineja/Ss
izeja/Ss
izlūksne/Ss
izolineja/Ss
izpilddokumentaceja/Ss
izpyldkomiteja/Ss
izplateiba/S
izskaņa/Ss
izteiksme/Ss
īcere/Ss
īpašeiba/Ss
jauneklis/Qq
jautreiba/Ss
Jordaneja/S
jubileja/Ss
kabeļtelevizeja/Ss
kafetereja/Ss
kalkulaceja/Ss
kaloreja/Ss
kapela/Ss
kapitulaceja/S
kaplis/QqRr
kartografeja/S
katalogizaceja/Ss
katedra/Ss
kauslis/QqRr
kavieklis/QqRr
keramika/Ss
kinokomedeja/Ss
kinologeja/S
klaviatura/Ss
klavierparteja/S
klints/Ss
koagulaceja/S
kolegeja/Ss
kolektivizaceja/S
koloneja/Ss
komandantura/Ss
komanda/Ss
komercinformaceja/Ss
komercoperaceja/Ss
Komiteja/Ss
komparteja/Ss
kompilaceja/Ss
kompreseja/S
komuneja/Ss
koncepceja/Ss
kondensaceja/S
konfeseja/Ss
konfrontaceja/S
konjunkceja/Ss
konservaceja/S
konstataceja/Ss
konstrukceja/Ss
kontrabanda/Ss
kontrasignaceja/S
kontrolaparatura/Ss
konveijerizaceja/Ss
konvekceja/Ss
kopeja/SsTt
kopgeneraceja/S
korporaceja/Ss
korupceja/S
kōrts/Ss
krauklis/QqRr
kreditlineja/Ss
krieklis/QqRr
kriminalizaceja/Ss
kriptografeja/S
kritika/Ss
krizantema/Ss
kryuklis/QqRr
krīze/Ss
kruška/Ss
kubatura/Ss
kulturviesture/S
kulturvīneiba/Ss
kuopslis/QqRr
kuorteiba/Ss-
kuoss/QqRr
kupris/QqRr
kūdūlstaceja/Ss
kūpeiba/S
ķimikaleja/Ss
laboratoreja/Ss
laiva/Ss
latgalīts/Qq
latifundeja/Ss
latvīts/Qq
lāzerterapeja/Ss
leidzeiba/Ss
leidzskans/Qq
leigumorganizaceja/Ss
leksikografeja/S
lidmašyna/Ss
lineja/Ss
literatura/Ss
lizeika/SsTt
lykumsakareiba/Ss
līceiba/Ss
līlburžuāzeja/S
lītuvīts/Qq
logika/S
lopa/SsTt
luocs/QqRr
ļuterticeiba/S
ļūbesteiba/Ss
magnoleja/Ss
maize/SsTt
Mandžureja/S
maneja/Ss
manufaktura/Ss
Markus/Ss
Marta/SsTt
matereja/Ss
meditaceja/Ss
mehanizaceja/Ss
meitine/SsTt
melioraceja/Ss
metalurgeja/Ss
meteorologeja/S
mieness/QqRr
mierkis/Qq
mierķdotaceja/Ss
mikstura/Ss
miliceja/S
mistereja/Ss
myužeiba/Ss
mīsa/Ss
molka/S
Monika/SsTt
monopolizaceja/S
mozuokumtauteiba/Ss
Mozus/S
muojtureiba/S
muosa/SsTt
muzyka/Ss
naceja/Ss
najaušeiba/S
napolarizaceja/Ss
natura/S
nauda/Ss
negaceja/Ss
nekrofileja/S
norma/Ss
nuove/S
nūmetne/Ss
nūpītneiba/S-
observatoreja/Ss
okupaceja/S
olimpiade/Ss
operaceja/Ss
ordinaceja/S
orgeja/Ss
ortodokseja/S
pacīteiba/S
paiseklis/QqRr
pakaļe/SsTt
paleigoperaceja/Ss
panseja/Ss
pareizraksteiba/Ss
parfimereja/S
paseja/Ss
pašvaļdeiba/Ss
patskans/Qq
pauperizaceja/S
pazeime/Ss
pediatreja/S
percepceja/S
personalizaceja/S
perturbaceja/Ss
petūneja/Ss
pilneiba/S-
pils/Ss
pylngadeiba/S
pyuslis/QqRr
pīdieklis/Qq
pīredze/Ss
planimetreja/S
pļova/SsTt
poema/Ss
policeja/S
populaceja/Ss
popularizaceja/S
poziceja/Ss
pōksts/Ss
preludeja/Ss
pretindikaceja/Ss
pretinformaceja/Ss
prīde/SsTt
prīdieklis/Qq
prīkšdzeja/S
proceseja/Ss
progoreiba/S
promoceja/Ss
proza/S
puiss/QqRr
puorbaude/Ss
puorinstalaceja/Ss
puormeja/Ss
puskoloneja/Ss
pusporceja/Ss
radiotranslaceja/S
raidorganizaceja/Ss
recenzeja/Ss
receptura/Ss
reglamentaceja/S
regreseja/Ss
rekomendaceja/Ss
reorganizaceja/Ss
reparaceja/Ss
retinopateja/S
revizeja/Ss
rymteiba/S
robotizaceja/Ss
ruociņs/QqRr
rūceiba/S
sabīdreiba/Ss
sakriteiba/Ss
Saldus/S
sastdīne/Ss
savteiba/S-
sekceja/Ss
selekceja/S
siedeklis/QqRr
sieņs/Ss
signatura/Ss
sistema/SsTt
sistematizaceja/S
sīva/SsTt
skaidreiba/S-
skaitlis/Qq
skručs/QqRr
skumbreja/Ss
Slovakeja/S
smilts/Ss
spākstaceja/Ss
spruodzine/Ss
staipeknis/QqRr
standartsituaceja/Ss
storpfrakceja/Ss
strategeja/Ss
streičs/QqRr
stričs/QqRr
studeja/Ss
stuovūklis/QqRr
sukne/Ss
suns/QqRr
suokumstadeja/Ss
suoļs/QqRr
svieteiba/Ss
šaureiba/S
škieris/st
taktika/Ss
tarifikaceja/S
teika/Ss
telefoneja/S
televizeja/Ss
terapeja/S
termobatereja/Ss
tipizaceja/S
tradiceja/Ss
trajektoreja/Ss
trešdīne/Ss
triangulaceja/S
uopss/QqRr
uoriškeiba/S-
uozs/QqRr
urbanizaceja/Ss
ūtadīne/Ss
vadeiba/Ss
Valerija/SsTt
vaļdeiba/Ss
varganis/st
vecs/QqRr
veirīts/Qq
veistūklis/QqRr
ventilaceja/S
vepris/QqRr
vērtine/SsTt
vierseiba/S
vierss/QqRr
viestule/Ss
viezs/QqRr
Vyduskrīveja/S
vīnskaitlis/Q
vīslekceja/Ss
vokalizaceja/Ss
Vuoceja/Ss
začs/QqRr
zaglis/QqRr
zeme/SsTt
Zemgus/Ss
zibsnis/QqRr
zoologeja/S
zorna/Ss
zuodžs/QqRr
žūreja/Ss
